District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0397.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA,
28 That this act may be cited as the "Zoning Decision Appeals Amendment Act of 2025".
29 Sec. 2. Section 11 of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act,
30 approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1209; D.C. Official Code§ 2-510), is amended by
31 adding a new subsection (a-1) to read as follows:
32 "( a-1 )( 1) Judicial review under this section of an order or decision of the Zoning
33 Commission, the Board of Zoning Adjustment, or the Mayor's Agent shall only be
34 available to a person who:

35 “(A)(i) Was granted party status by the Zoning Commission, Board
36 of Zoning Adjustment, or Mayor’s Agent in the contested case for which the person seeks
37 judicial review;
38 “(ii) Owns or legally occupies a property within 200 feet of
39 the property that is the subject of the contested case and filed a letter of support,
40 opposition, or of no position in the contested case; or
41 “(iii) For the purposes of judicial review of an order or
42 decision of the Mayor’s Agent, is a historic preservation organization as defined in 10-C
43 DCMR § 9901;
44 “(B) Files a petition for judicial review within 30 days after the
45 order or decision is mailed or emailed to the person by the Zoning Commission, the
46 Board of Zoning Adjustment, or the Mayor’s Agent, 30 days after the date the decision or
47 order is published in the District of Columbia Register, or 30 days after the date the
48 decision or order is published on a website of the District government, whichever comes
49 first, unless a later date is consented to by all respondents listed in the petition for review;
50 and
51 “(C) Pleads, in its petition for judicial review, specific facts
52 sufficient to support the existence of a particularized harm suffered by the person and
53 that:
54 “(i) Substantial evidence of the particularized harm was
55 presented to the Zoning Commission, the Board of Zoning Adjustment, or the Mayor’s
56 Agent during the contested case;
2

57 “(ii) The person’s particularized harm relates to the zoning
58 relief granted or denied;
59 (iii) The person’s particularized harm is not shared by the
60 general public; and
61 “(iv) The particularized harm is capable of being redressed
62 by a favorable decision by the Court.
63 “(2) The Court shall not have jurisdiction under subsection (a) of this
64 section of a petition for judicial review of an order or decision of the Zoning
65 Commission, the Board of Zoning Adjustment, or the Mayor’s Agent that does not satisfy
66 the requirements set forth in paragraph (1) of this subsection.
67 “(3)(A)(i) The Court may, upon the motion of a party or intervenor in the
68 appeal who is the person in whose favor the order or decision in the contested case was
69 issued (the “prevailing party in the zoning decision”), require a person who filed a
70 petition for judicial review covered by this subsection (the “petitioner”) to file a bond of
71 sufficient surety in an amount the Court considers proper, not to exceed $250,000, to
72 indemnify the prevailing party in the zoning decision against damages which such party
73 may sustain due to delays caused by the appeal; provided, that the likelihood and
74 estimated amount of damages is substantiated in the motion.
75 “(ii) In deciding whether to require such a bond and
76 determining the amount of the bond, if any, the Court shall consider the goal of
77 discouraging frivolous and vexatious appeals, the goal of not discouraging meritorious
78 appeals, the extent to which the delays caused by the appeal may harm the public interest,
3

79 the ability of the petitioner to pay the bond and the financial burden of the payment
80 relative to the petitioner’s means, and the apparent meritoriousness of the appeal.
81 “(B)(i) If the order or decision in the contested case is affirmed by
82 the Court, the Court may, if a bond was required under subparagraph (A) of this
83 paragraph and upon the motion of the prevailing party in the zoning decision, order the
84 petitioner to pay to the prevailing party in the zoning decision an amount the Court
85 considers proper to compensate the prevailing party in the zoning decision for the
86 damages it sustained due to delays caused by the appeal; provided, that the amount
87 ordered to be paid shall not exceed $250,000.
88 “(ii) In determining whether to order such a payment, and
89 the amount of such payment to award, if any, the Court shall consider the extent to which
90 the prevailing party in the zoning decision has substantiated that it sustained damages due
91 to delays caused by the appeal, whether the delays caused by the appeal harmed the
92 public interest, the goal of discouraging frivolous and vexatious appeals, the goal of not
93 discouraging meritorious appeals, the ability of the petitioner to make the payment and
94 the financial burden of the payment relative to the petitioner’s means, and the
95 meritoriousness of the appeal.
96 “(4) If the order or decision is affirmed by the Court and the Court finds
97 that the appeal was frivolous or filed for an improper purpose, such as to harass or to
98 cause unnecessary delay, the Court may order the petitioner to reimburse to the prevailing
99 party in the zoning decision reasonable attorney’s fees and other costs incurred by it in
100 defending against the appeal in an amount not to exceed $50,000.
4

101 “(5) For the purposes of this subsection, the term “Mayor’s Agent” means
102 a person designated by the Mayor to issue orders or decisions in contested cases pursuant
103 to the Historic Landmark and Historic District Protection Act of 1978, effective March 3,
104 1979 (D.C. Law 2-144; D.C. Official Code § 6-1101 et seq.), or the individual to whom
105 such person has delegated the authority to issue orders or decisions in such contested
106 cases.”.
107 Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
108 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the
109 fiscal impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act
110 of 1975, approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
111 Sec. 4. Effective date.
112 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto
113 by the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of
114 congressional review as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home
115 Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-
116 206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of Columbia Register.
5

Government of the District of Columbia
Office of the Chief Financial Officer
Glen Lee
Chief Financial Officer
MEMORANDUM
TO: The Honorable Phil Mendelson
Chairman, Council of the District of Columbia
FROM: Glen Lee
Chief Financial Officer
DATE: September 24, 2025
SUBJECT: Fiscal Impact Statement – Zoning Decision Appeals Amendment Act of
2025
REFERENCE: Draft Bill as provided to the Office of Revenue Analysis on September
23, 2025
Conclusion
Funds are sufficient in the fiscal year 2026 through fiscal year 2029 budget and financial plan to
implement the bill.
Background
The bill changes zoning appeals procedures for matters before the Zoning Commission, the Board of
Zoning Adjustment, and the Mayor’s Agent for Historic Preservation. Specifically, judicial reviews
would be limited to an individual who was granted party status at the administrative proceeding or
owns or occupies property within a 200-foot radius of the subject property in the case, as well as to
a historic preservation organization.
The bill requires filings of appeals to be made within 30 days of a decision1. The appeal must
demonstrate specific facts proving harm suffered and show that these facts were raised at the lower
level and that they are capable of being redressed by a favorable decision by the court.
The bill allows a court to require a petitioner post bond during an appeal not to exceed $250,000, to
account for the costs of possible delays to a project imposed on the property owner if the appeal is
not successful.
1 To be counted from the date the decision is mailed or emailed to the person, published in the District of
Columbia Register, or published on the website of the District of Columbia government.
1350 Pennsylvania Avenue, NW, Suite 203, Washington, DC 20004 (202)727-2476
www.cfo.dc.gov

The Honorable Phil Mendelson
FIS: “Zoning Decision Appeals Amendment Act of 2025,” Draft bill as provided to the Office of Revenue
Analysis on September 23, 2025
Lastly, the bill permits a court to order reimbursement of attorney’s fees or other costs incurred if
the court finds that the appeal was frivolous or filed for an improper purpose, not to exceed $50,000.
Financial Plan Impact
Funds are sufficient in the fiscal year 2026 through fiscal year 2029 budget and financial plan to
implement the bill. Limiting zoning decision appeals does not have a cost to District agencies.
Page 2 of 2

GOVERNMENT OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
BRIAN L. SCHWALB
ATTORNEY GENERAL
LEGAL COUNSEL DIVISION
MEMORANDUM
TO: Tomás Talamante
Director
Office of Policy and Legislative Affairs
FROM: Adele El-Khouri
Deputy Attorney General
Legal Counsel Division
DATE: September 24, 2025
SUBJECT: Legal Sufficiency Review of Draft “Zoning Decision Appeals Amendment Act of
2025”
(AE-25-488)
_____________________________________________________________________________________
This is to Certify that
this Office has reviewed the above-referenced draft
legislation and found it to be legally sufficient. If you have any questions in this regard, please do
not hesitate to call me at (202) 262-6402.
_________________________________
Adele El-Khouri
3